Utah statutes.
30-1-34.   Certificate of completion of counseling.
The county clerk of any county which has adopted this act shall issue a
marriage license to those applicants who come within the premarital counseling
requirements of this act when the applicants present a certificate from the
premarital counseling board that the counseling has been completed or has been
found to be adequate if the license application otherwise conforms to the
requirements for issuance of a marriage license. For those applicants who
would otherwise need approval of the district court in order to marry, the
certificate shall take the place of court consent if the parents, guardian or
custodial parent of the applicant have given their consent to the marriage.
